Utah statutes.
57-8-13.12.   Land to be withdrawn or added to project -- Applicability of
restrictions.
No covenants, restrictions, limitations, or other representations or
commitments in the declaration concerning anything that is or is not to be
done on the additional land, the withdrawable land, or any portion of either,
shall be binding as to any portion of either lawfully withdrawn from the
condominium project or never added to it except to the extent that the
declaration so provides. In the case of any covenant, restriction, limitation,
or other representation or commitment in the declaration or in any other
agreement requiring the declarant to add any portion of the additional land or
to withdraw any portion of the withdrawable land, or imposing any obligations
concerning anything that is or is not to be done on it or concerning it, or
imposing any obligations about anything that is or is not to be done on or in
respect to the condominium project or any portion of it, this section shall
not be construed to nullify, limit, or otherwise affect any such obligation.
